Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1714
Authority; quorum; actions; vacancy; effect.

Four members of the authority shall constitute a quorum. The affirmative vote of a majority of all of the members of the authority shall be necessary for any action taken by the authority. A vacancy in the membership of the authority shall not impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority. Any action taken by the authority under the Nebraska Educational Finance Authority Act may be authorized by resolution at any regular or special meeting, and each such resolution shall take effect immediately and need not be published or posted.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 14;

Laws 1984, LB 644, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2914;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 14.